Nebraska, session 109, LB343.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB343 LB343
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-3,104.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is amended to read:
60-3,104.01 (1)(a) (1) A person may apply for specialty license
plates in lieu of regular license plates on an application prescribed and
provided by the department pursuant to section 60-3,104.02 for any motor
vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, except for motor vehicles or trailers
registered under section 60-3,198.
(b) An applicant receiving a specialty license plate for a farm
truck with a gross weight of over sixteen tons or for a commercial motor
vehicle registered for a gross weight of five tons or over shall affix
the appropriate tonnage decal to the plate.
(c) The department shall make forms available for such applications.
Each application for initial issuance or renewal of specialty license
plates shall be accompanied by a fee of:
(i) Before October 1, 2025, seventy dollars; and .
(ii) Beginning October 1, 2025, forty dollars.
(d) Fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit sixty percent of
the fee for initial issuance and renewal of specialty license plates to
the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund and forty percent of the fee
to the Highway Trust Fund.
(2)(a) When the department receives an application for specialty
license plates, the department may deliver the plates and registration
certificate to the applicant by United States mail or to the county
treasurer of the county in which the motor vehicle, trailer, or
semitrailer is registered and the delivery of the plates and registration
certificate shall be made through a secure process and system. Beginning
on an implementation date designated by the director on or before January
1, 2022, if delivery of the plates and registration certificate is made
by the department to the applicant, the department may charge a postage
and handling fee in an amount not more than necessary to recover the cost
-2-

LB343 LB343
2025 2025
of postage and handling for the specific items mailed to the registrant.
The department shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for credit to
the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. The county treasurer or the
department shall issue specialty license plates in lieu of regular
license plates when the applicant complies with the other provisions of
law for registration of the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer. If
specialty license plates are lost, stolen, or mutilated, the licensee
shall be issued replacement license plates pursuant to section 60-3,157.
(b) The county treasurer or the department may issue temporary
license stickers to the applicant under this section for the applicant to
lawfully operate the vehicle pending receipt of the license plates. No
charge in addition to the registration fee shall be made for the issuance
of a temporary license sticker under this subdivision. The department
shall furnish temporary license stickers for issuance by the county
treasurer at no cost to the counties. The department may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations regarding the design and issuance of
temporary license stickers.
(3)(a) The owner of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer bearing
specialty license plates may make application to the county treasurer to
have such specialty license plates transferred to a motor vehicle,
trailer, or semitrailer other than the motor vehicle, trailer, or
semitrailer for which such plates were originally purchased if such motor
vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is owned by the owner of the specialty
license plates.
(b) The owner may have the unused portion of the specialty license
plate fee credited to the other motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer
which will bear the specialty license plates at the rate of eight and
one-third percent per month for each full month left in the registration
period.
(c) Application for such transfer shall be accompanied by a fee of
three dollars. Fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be
-3-

LB343 LB343
2025 2025
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor
Vehicles Cash Fund.
Sec. 2. Original section 60-3,104.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-